Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 32. Estates Above Surface

38-32-101.
Estates may be created.

Estates, rights, and interests in areas above the surface of the ground, whether or not contiguous thereto, may be validly created in persons or corporations other than the owners of the land below such areas and shall be deemed to be estates, rights, and interests in lands.

History.

Source:
L. 53:

P. 202, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 118-12-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-12-1.

38-32-102.
Estates deemed estates in land.

Estates, rights, and interests in such areas shall pass by descent and distribution in the same manner as estates, rights, and interests in land and may be held, enjoyed, possessed, alienated, conveyed, exchanged, transferred, assigned, demised, released, charged, mortgaged, or otherwise encumbered, devised, and bequeathed in the same manner, upon the same conditions, and for the same uses and purposes as estates, rights, and interests in land and shall be in all other respects dealt with and treated as estates, rights, and interests in land.

History.

Source:
L. 53:

P. 202, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 118-12-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-12-2.

38-32-103.
Rights, incidents, and duties.

All of the rights, privileges, incidents, powers, remedies, burdens, duties, liabilities, and restrictions pertaining to estates, rights, and interests in land shall appertain and be applicable to such estates, rights, and interests in areas above the surface of the ground.

History.

Source:
L. 53:

P. 202, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 118-12-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-12-3.

38-32-104.
Laws on land applicable.

The provisions of articles 30 to 44 of this title and of any other law of this state shall be applicable to estates, rights, and interests created in areas above the surface of the ground and to instruments creating, disposing of, or otherwise affecting such estates, rights, and interests wherever such provisions would be applicable to estates, rights, and interests in land or to instruments creating, disposing of, or otherwise affecting estates, rights, and interests in land.

History.

Source:
L. 53:

P. 202, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 118-12-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-12-4.

38-32-105.
Estates affected.

The provisions of this article shall be applicable to such estates, rights, and interests created in areas above the surface of the ground, whether such estates, rights, and interests were created prior to or after March 12, 1953.

History.

Source:
L. 53:

P. 203, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 118-12-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 118-12-5.